Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,138
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; information; release.

The authorized agency which receives information pursuant to sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142 may release or provide such information to any other authorized agency.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 5.